Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,106
Distribution; right or title of distributee.

Proof that a distributee has received an instrument or deed of distribution of assets in kind, or payment in distribution, from a personal representative is conclusive evidence that the distributee has succeeded to the interest of the estate in the distributed assets, as against all persons interested in the estate, except that the personal representative may recover the assets or their value if the distribution was improper.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 184, UPC § 3-908.